Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-509.01
Session laws; journals; sale; section, termination.

The Clerk of the Legislature is hereby authorized and directed to sell unbound print copies of the session laws and unbound print copies of the daily journal of each legislative session at such price as shall be prescribed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, which price shall not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs. For the unbound print journal and laws of a special session, when published separately from that of a regular session, the price shall be as recommended by the Clerk of the Legislature and approved by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1971, LB 36, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 7, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 534, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 12.
July 18, 2026